Hawaii statutes.
§37-52.5 Criteria for the establishment and
continuance of administratively established accounts and funds. (a) The
judiciary and any department or agency that administratively establishes any
new account or fund, within thirty working days of its establishment, shall
transmit a report to the legislature. The report to the legislature shall
include:

(1) The justification for the establishment of the
account or fund; and

(2) The sources of revenue for the fund.

(b) The judiciary and each department or
agency, at least twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session,
shall submit a report to the legislature. The report shall include:

(1) A list of all administratively established
accounts or funds; and

(2) All revenues, expenditures, encumbrances, and
ending balances of each account or fund. [L 2002, c 178, pt of §2; am L 2005, c
154, §1; am L 2016, c 166, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next